Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.092

Cannabis.

"Cannabis," except as otherwise provided in this title, has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

[ 2022 c 16 s 37.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.